public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A ertonar artonisione ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisioni/M ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisionse ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisié/P ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisiéde/P ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisiége/P ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonison/L ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisone ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisoni/M ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisonse ertonar
SFX A ertonar artoniven/L ertonar
SFX A ertonar artoniveni/M ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivense ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivion/L ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivioni/M ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivionse ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivié/P ertonar
SFX A ertonar artoniviéu/Q ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivon/L ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivoni/M ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivonse ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonié/P ertonar
SFX A ertonar artoniéde/P ertonar
SFX A ertonar artoniége/P ertonar
SFX A ertonar artoniéu/Q ertonar
SFX A ertonar artono/JL ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonon/L ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonone ertonar
SFX A ertonar artononi/M ertonar
SFX A ertonar artononse ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonà/ ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàa/JLPR ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàami/K ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàau/Q ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàe/JL ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàelo/S ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàemi/K ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonài/NP ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàimo/L ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàimoi/M ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàitu/O ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàndome/G ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàndomene/G ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonào/JL ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàomi/K ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàrmene/G ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàsimo ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvami/K ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvau/Q ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvelo/S ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvemi/K ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvimo/L ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvimoi/M ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvitu/O ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvomi/K ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonè/FP ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonème/H ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonèu/Q ertonar
SFX A ertonar artoné/FP ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéa/JLPR ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéami/K ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéau/Q ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonée/JL ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéelo/S ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéemi/K ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéi/NP ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéimo/L ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéimoi/M ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéitu/O ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonémoi/M ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéndome/G ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéndomene/G ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéo/JL ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéomi/K ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonésimo ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéu/Q ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonévami/K ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonévau/Q ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonévelo/S ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonévemi/K ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonévimo/L ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonévimoi/M ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonévitu/O ertonar
SFX A ertonar artonévomi/K ertonar
SFX A ertonar artónelo/S ertonar
SFX A ertonar artóneme/H ertonar
SFX A ertonar artónemi/K ertonar
SFX A ertonar artónitu/O ertonar
SFX A ertonar artónomi/K ertonar
SFX A ervar arvada ervar
SFX A ervar arvade ervar
SFX A ervar arvadi ervar
SFX A ervar arvado ervar
SFX A ervar arvando/E ervar
SFX A ervar arvante/ ervar
SFX A ervar arvar/E ervar
SFX A ervar arvaralo/S ervar
SFX A ervar arvarami/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvaratu/O ervar
SFX A ervar arvarave/RT ervar
SFX A ervar arvare ervar
SFX A ervar arvaremo/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvaren/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvareni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvarense ervar
SFX A ervar arvaresi/P ervar
SFX A ervar arvaresiu/Q ervar
SFX A ervar arvarion/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvarioni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvarionse ervar
SFX A ervar arvarisen/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvariseni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvarisense ervar
SFX A ervar arvarision/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvarisioni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvarisionse ervar
SFX A ervar arvarisié/P ervar
SFX A ervar arvarisiéu/Q ervar
SFX A ervar arvarison/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvarisoni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvarisonse ervar
SFX A ervar arvarié/P ervar
SFX A ervar arvariéu/Q ervar
SFX A ervar arvarme/G ervar
SFX A ervar arvaron/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvaroni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvaronse ervar
SFX A ervar arvarà/JLNR ervar
SFX A ervar arvaràe/R ervar
SFX A ervar arvarè/JL ervar
SFX A ervar arvarèmi/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvaré/P ervar
SFX A ervar arvarémoi/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvarésimo/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvarésimoi/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvaréu/Q ervar
SFX A ervar arvaría/JLNR ervar
SFX A ervar arvaríami/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvaríatu/O ervar
SFX A ervar arvaríe/JLR ervar
SFX A ervar arvaríelo/S ervar
SFX A ervar arvaríemi/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvarò/JL ervar
SFX A ervar arvaròmi/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvase/I ervar
SFX A ervar arvasi ervar
SFX A ervar arvasta/I ervar
SFX A ervar arvaste/I ervar
SFX A ervar arvasti/I ervar
SFX A ervar arvasto/I ervar
SFX A ervar arvava/JLPR ervar
SFX A ervar arvave/JL ervar
SFX A ervar arvavi/NP ervar
SFX A ervar arvavo/JL ervar
SFX A ervar arvede ervar
SFX A ervar arvege ervar
SFX A ervar arvemo/L ervar
SFX A ervar arven/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvendo/E ervar
SFX A ervar arvene ervar
SFX A ervar arveni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvense ervar
SFX A ervar arvese/I ervar
SFX A ervar arvesi ervar
SFX A ervar arvesta/I ervar
SFX A ervar arveste/I ervar
SFX A ervar arvesti/I ervar
SFX A ervar arvesto/I ervar
SFX A ervar arveva/JLPR ervar
SFX A ervar arveve/JL ervar
SFX A ervar arvevi/NP ervar
SFX A ervar arvevo/JL ervar
SFX A ervar arvion/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvione ervar
SFX A ervar arvioni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvionse ervar
SFX A ervar arvisen/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvisene ervar
SFX A ervar arviseni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvisense ervar
SFX A ervar arvision/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvisione ervar
SFX A ervar arvisioni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvisionse ervar
SFX A ervar arvisié/P ervar
SFX A ervar arvisiéde/P ervar
SFX A ervar arvisiége/P ervar
SFX A ervar arvison/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvisone ervar
SFX A ervar arvisoni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvisonse ervar
SFX A ervar arviven/L ervar
SFX A ervar arviveni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvivense ervar
SFX A ervar arvivion/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvivioni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvivionse ervar
SFX A ervar arvivié/P ervar
SFX A ervar arviviéu/Q ervar
SFX A ervar arvivon/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvivoni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvivonse ervar
SFX A ervar arvié/P ervar
SFX A ervar arviéde/P ervar
SFX A ervar arviége/P ervar
SFX A ervar arviéu/Q ervar
SFX A ervar arvon/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvone ervar
SFX A ervar arvoni/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvonse ervar
SFX A ervar arvà/ ervar
SFX A ervar arvàa/JLPR ervar
SFX A ervar arvàami/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvàau/Q ervar
SFX A ervar arvàe/JL ervar
SFX A ervar arvàelo/S ervar
SFX A ervar arvàemi/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvài/NP ervar
SFX A ervar arvàimo/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvàimoi/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvàitu/O ervar
SFX A ervar arvàndome/G ervar
SFX A ervar arvàndomene/G ervar
SFX A ervar arvào/JL ervar
SFX A ervar arvàomi/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvàrmene/G ervar
SFX A ervar arvàsimo ervar
SFX A ervar arvàvami/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvàvau/Q ervar
SFX A ervar arvàvelo/S ervar
SFX A ervar arvàvemi/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvàvimo/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvàvimoi/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvàvitu/O ervar
SFX A ervar arvàvomi/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvè/FP ervar
SFX A ervar arvème/H ervar
SFX A ervar arvèu/Q ervar
SFX A ervar arvé/FP ervar
SFX A ervar arvéa/JLPR ervar
SFX A ervar arvéami/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvéau/Q ervar
SFX A ervar arvée/JL ervar
SFX A ervar arvéelo/S ervar
SFX A ervar arvéemi/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvéi/NP ervar
SFX A ervar arvéimo/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvéimoi/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvéitu/O ervar
SFX A ervar arvémoi/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvéndome/G ervar
SFX A ervar arvéndomene/G ervar
SFX A ervar arvéo/JL ervar
SFX A ervar arvéomi/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvésimo ervar
SFX A ervar arvéu/Q ervar
SFX A ervar arvévami/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvévau/Q ervar
SFX A ervar arvévelo/S ervar
SFX A ervar arvévemi/K ervar
SFX A ervar arvévimo/L ervar
SFX A ervar arvévimoi/M ervar
SFX A ervar arvévitu/O ervar
SFX A ervar arvévomi/K ervar
