public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
adintar/A
albergar/A
alterar/A
anaƚixar/A
arbitrar/A
argomentar/A
asénter/A
asidar/A
inaxear/A
bagateƚar/A
xbaketar/A
inbalegar/A
inbaƚordir/A
inbalukar/A
xbanpolar/A
inbarbaɉar/A
barxeletar/A
batiđar/A
inbaukir/A
baxukiar/A
dexbendar/A
xbesoƚar/A
biankidar/A
xbimar/A
birbantar/A
blaterar/A
soboɉir/A
dexboƚar/A
abonbar/A
bordedar/A
inboskaɉar/A
inbosar/A
inbragar/A
brandir/A
xbrefelar/A
xbroacar/A
xbroentar/A
brusketar/A
buƚegar/A
xbuxar/A
incapetar/A
ceƚerar/A
intracéñer/A
scinkar/A
dir/A
davañar/A
destrejar/A
xdindolar/A
doɉidar/A
domar/A
adorar/A
xdrelar/A
prodúxer/A
davajar/A
dogatolar/A
inxónxer/A
xugar/A
strađurar/A
elèxer/A
riéser/A
exekrar/A
strafar/A
falkar/A
famejaridar/A
desfasar/A
infasolar/A
paxifegar/A
defénder/A
sferdir/A
sfiadar/A
desfibrar/A
desfiƚar/A
sfinir/A
fisar/A
fluir/A
sfoɉar/A
trasforar/A
formigolar/A
arfosar/A
frantumar/A
fratar/A
fregolar/A
sfritegar/A
fruñolar/A
sfumar/A
fuxir/A
galexar/A
ingaluŧar/A
xgarar/A
xgargariđar/A
xgaxolar/A
gòder/A
gorgedar/A
gramoƚar/A
xgrankir/A
dexagravar/A
xgrendenar/A
ingrinŧar/A
grixolir/A
ingrumar/A
guarir/A
regurxitar/A
indasenar/A
inondar/A
interiŧir/A
ipotidar/A
inɉarar/A
xjedoƚar/A
jetar/A
xɉoŧar/A
ɉustar/A
deskaenaŧar/A
kalafatar/A
kalkoƚar/A
kalsinar/A
inkanaƚar/A
inkankarir/A
skanŧelar/A
rekapitolar/A
karatelar/A
karnevalar/A
kartexar/A
inkaspar/A
inkatiɉar/A
prokasar/A
kavalkar/A
inkinar/A
koɉonar/A
skoƚar/A
koltivar/A
sokónber/A
konpanadegar/A
kontiđar/A
koñar/A
deskorajir/A
skòrxer/A
inkorporar/A
skotolar/A
skovèrđer/A
rinkréser/A
skrokolar/A
inkrosolar/A
kuajar/A
kuerelar/A
rinkuƚar/A
kurioxar/A
lagar/A
ƚanpixar/A
inlardar/A
inlasar/A
ledrar/A
xlénxer/A
alevar/A
deƚiberar/A
likuidar/A
xlisar/A
interlokuir/A
stralosar/A
dexlubiar/A
reƚúxer/A
xmagrar/A
permaner/A
manifestar/A
mañetidar/A
marɉar/A
inmascar/A
matiđar/A
maŧipar/A
inframeđar/A
menar/A
menxonar/A
deméter/A
mexurar/A
xminuir/A
mòjer/A
xmolacar/A
montar/A
amorbar/A
inmortalar/A
remòver/A
inmuƚar/A
mutoƚir/A
xnaturar/A
xnegrixar/A
nobilir/A
xnonboƚar/A
nuvolir/A
ñokoƚar/A
inojar/A
onbriđar/A
ontolar/A
organexar/A
osixenar/A
pacugar/A
inpajar/A
paletar/A
palpeđar/A
konpanexar/A
papar/A
sparir/A
despartir/A
oltrepasar/A
pastidar/A
spatriar/A
spavenar/A
despegolar/A
speƚatar/A
speneƚar/A
konpenetrar/A
repeonar/A
personaliđar/A
petexolar/A
inpeŧar/A
pianar/A
piàxer/A
inpikolir/A
despionbar/A
spisakiar/A
piŧolar/A
replikar/A
poltronidar/A
frapóner/A
apontar/A
spontidar/A
asportar/A
inpotar/A
prèmer/A
apresiar/A
sprofondar/A
spuleđar/A
spurgar/A
rabiar/A
raɉar/A
ranxar/A
rasionar/A
dexredar/A
relaŧionar/A
rexegar/A
riŧar/A
robar/A
rokir/A
ronkexar/A
rostelar/A
dexruxenir/A
rumar/A
saetar/A
saƚir/A
salidar/A
desanguar/A
satiriđar/A
scanxar/A
sedolar/A
seguir/A
aseɉar/A
deselexar/A
disentir/A
inseraɉar/A
sevitar/A
konsiderar/A
simular/A
sixilar/A
skandalidar/A
deskarseƚar/A
skeɉar/A
skoar/A
skrimiatolar/A
skuarar/A
arsoƚar/A
insolfarar/A
insoniar/A
resòrxer/A
spanar/A
inspear/A
prospetar/A
spinfarar/A
spoƚar/A
star/A
instalar/A
stansiar/A
sterilidar/A
estirpar/A
instivalar/A
stralar/A
kostrénxer/A
stroŧar/A
studiar/A	po:verb
sublimar/A
insuperbir/A
intabarar/A
stajuŧar/A
intanbarar/A
intardegar/A
tastedar/A
intavolar/A
esténder/A
tenpoređar/A
ténxer/A
apartèñer/A
sostéñer/A
terŧariolar/A
tinbrar/A
toir/A
tolerar/A
stonfar/A
tornar/A
intòrxer/A
tràer/A
trakejar/A
stransir/A
tratexar/A
destregoƚar/A
tridolar/A
detronar/A
introxar/A
tuteƚar/A
insanpar/A
ŧekatredar/A
selebrar/A
insénder/A
reŧerkar/A
desŧervelar/A
ŧigar/A
ŧimegar/A
antiŧipar/A
sitar/A
deŧolar/A
insukar/A
umiliar/A
reuxar/A
sprevaler/A
vanpir/A
vaŧinar/A
travéder/A
invelenir/A
redeventar/A
intraveñir/A
konvèñer/A
inverđelar/A
xvergoñaŧar/A
intraversar/A
reinvestir/A
viađar/A
vínŧer/A
visar/A
provixionar/A
volar/A
volponar/A
invòlxer/A
xaolar/A
xbitar/A
inxeñatolar/A
xirandoƚar/A
xmartir/A
prexudegar/A
asentar/A
pàser/A
xgueltir/A
evidenŧiar/A
kanaƚixar/A
selesionar/A
kanaɉar/A
inđelir/A
intasar/A
mukar/A
ruar/A
skarpexar/A
xgropar/A
spiñatar/A
xeneraƚixar/A
buƚar/A
